North Carolina, session 2025, HB479.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The State of North Carolina shall convey to the Town of Burgaw,
for consideration of one dollar ($1.00), all its rights, titles, and interests in approximately 11 acres
of the approximately 355.73 acre parcel identified with Land Asset ID 6095 in the inventory of
State-owned land maintained by the Department of Administration pursuant to G.S. 143-341.
This is the same property identified with PIN Number 3229-04-1665-0000, as seen in the Office
of the Tax Administrator in Pender County, and is described in part in Deed Book 211, Page 279
and Deed Book 922, Page 191 in the Pender County Register of Deeds. The Department of
Administration, in consultation with the Town of Burgaw, shall determine specifically which
portion of the land described in this subsection shall be transferred pursuant to this section.
SECTION 1.(b) The conveyance pursuant to Section 1(a) of this act is subject to a
reversionary interest reserved by the State. The property shall be conveyed to the Town of
Burgaw for so long as it is utilized for public purposes.
SECTION 2. The State of North Carolina shall convey the real property described
in Section 1 of this act "as is" and "where is" without warranty. The State makes no
representations or warranties concerning the title to the property, the boundaries of the property,
the uses to which the property may be put, zoning, local ordinances, or any physical,
environmental, health, and safety conditions relating to the property. All costs associated with
the conveyance of the property shall be borne by the Town of Burgaw.
SECTION 3. The conveyance of the State's rights, titles, and interests in the real
property described in Section 1 of this act shall be exempt from the provisions of Article 7 of
Chapter 146 of the General Statutes. The conveyance shall comply with the provisions of Article
16 of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes, provided that the provisions of G.S. 146-74 shall not
apply.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H479-v-1*